District of Columbia statutes.
2-351.01

Purposes and policies.

(a)

This chapter shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

(b)

In enacting this chapter, the Council supports the following statutory purposes:

(1)

To simplify, clarify, and modernize the law governing the procurement of goods, services, and construction items by the District government;

(2)

To foster effective and equitably broad-based competition in the District by supporting the free enterprise system and the certified business enterprise program as set forth in subchapter IX-A of Chapter 2 of this title [§ 2-218.01 et seq.], and its implementing rules;

(3)

To obtain full and open competition by providing that contractors are given adequate opportunities to bid;

(4)

To ensure the fair and equitable treatment of all persons who deal with the procurement system of the District government;

(5)

To increase public confidence in the procedures followed in public procurement;

(6)

To promote efficiency and eliminate duplication in the District government procurement organization and operation to reduce costs;

(7)

To provide increased economy in procurement activities and maximize, to the fullest extent practicable, the purchasing power of the District government;

(8)

To permit the continued development of procurement laws, policies, and practices;

(9)

To provide for timely, effective, and efficient service to District agencies and individuals doing business with the District government;

(10)

To promote the development of uniform procurement procedures District government-wide;

(11)

To improve the understanding of procurement laws and policies within the District government by organizations and individuals doing business with the District government; and

(12)

To promote, to the maximum extent feasible, the purchase of environmentally preferable products and services.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 101, 58 DCR 1185

Cross References

Eastern market real property asset management and outdoor vending, contract with nonprofit association or corporation to operate farmers’ market, see § 37-105.
Mental Health Services Client Enterprise Program, exception from the provisions of this chapter, see § 44-921.
Non-health related occupations and professions licensure, staffing and administration of licensure boards, contracts for support services, see § 47-2853.10.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-301.01, § 2-1217.34f, § 2-1594, § 4-1303.03, § 7-1131.04, § 8-1778.25, § 8-1778.45, § 9-107.56, § 10-1802, § 22-4235, § 24-101a, § 34-1312.05, § 34-2202.14, § 34-2202.17, § 42-815.02, § 47-1303.04, § 47-1336, and § 50-211.02.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 2-301.01.